Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1606
Education, defined.

Education means any action which provides information, instruction, or safety guidelines about propane, propane equipment, mechanical and technical practices, and uses of propane to propane consumers or industry employees.

Laws 1998, LB 699, § 6.